Illinois, session 104th, SB1839.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Professional Regulation Law 5of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by 6adding Section 2105-406 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2105/2105-406 new)8    Sec. 2105-406. Fee waiver and refund. If the Department 9does not process an application for a license within 30 days 10after receiving the application, the Department shall waive 11the applicant's application fee or, if the applicant has 12already paid the application fee, the Department shall refund 13the applicant's application fee.